Utah statutes.
75-4-202.   Payment or delivery discharges.
Payment or delivery made in good faith on the basis of the proof of authority
and affidavit under Section 75-4-201 releases the debtor or person having
possession of the personal property to the same extent as if payment or
delivery had been made to a local personal representative.
